Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-1003] Proper plaintiff. A
derivative action may be maintained only by a person that is a partner at the
time the action is commenced and:

(1) That was a partner when the conduct giving rise
to the action occurred; or

(2) Whose status as a partner devolved upon the
person by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership
agreement from a person that was a partner at the time of the conduct. [L 2003,
c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next